District of Columbia statutes.
29-306.40

Officers.

(a)

A corporation shall have the officers described in its bylaws or appointed by the board of directors in accordance with the bylaws.

(b)

The board of directors may elect individuals to fill one or more offices of the corporation. An officer may appoint one or more officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

(c)

The bylaws or the board of directors shall assign to one of the officers responsibility for preparing the minutes of the directors’ and shareholders’ meetings and for maintaining and authenticating the records of the corporation required to be kept under § 29-313.01(a) and (e).

(d)

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in a corporation.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-301.02.